District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-303.16

Special rules of evidence and procedure.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 315, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 316, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(16), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.15.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.15

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (a), substituted “a nonresident party who is an individual in a tribunal” for “the petitioner in a responding tribunal”; in subsec. (e), substituted “record” for “writing”; in subsec. (f), substituted “shall” for “may”; added subsec. (j); and rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) A verified petition, affidavit, or document substantially complying with federally mandated forms, and a document incorporated by reference in any of them, not excluded under the hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under oath by a party or witness residing in another state.”

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.16 has been recodified as § 46-303.17 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(17).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 316 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).